Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-113] Commissions. (a) An
insurance company or insurance producer shall not pay a commission, service
fee, brokerage fee, or other valuable consideration to a person for selling,
soliciting, or negotiating insurance in this State if that person is required
to be licensed under this article and is not so licensed.

(b) A person shall not accept a commission,
service fee, brokerage fee, or other valuable consideration for selling,
soliciting, or negotiating insurance in this State if that person is required
to be licensed under this article and is not so licensed.

(c) Renewal or other deferred commissions may
be paid to a person for selling, soliciting, or negotiating insurance in this
State if that person was required to be licensed under this article at the time
of the sale, solicitation, or negotiation and was so licensed.

(d) An insurer or insurance producer may pay
or assign commissions, service fees, brokerage fees, or other valuable
consideration to an insurance agency or to persons who do not sell, solicit, or
negotiate insurance in this State, unless the payment would violate section
431:13-103. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next